District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.06

Maintenance.

An owner subject to this subchapter shall maintain each smoke detector in a reliable operating condition and shall make periodic inspections and tests to ensure that each smoke detector is in proper working condition.

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 7, 24 DCR 9050

History

1981 Ed., § 5-534.
1973 Ed., § 5-333.

Prior Codifications